West Virginia, session 2026, SB515.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13.  medication-assisted treatment PROGRAM licensing act. §16B-13-4a. Drug testing during progression of treatment for substance use disorder. (a) Upon being admitted as a patient to an office-based medication-assisted treatment program, the provider shall perform a comprehensive, definitive drug test.(b) After this time and continuing for six weeks, a direct observation, definitive test must be performed every two weeks for six weeks.(c) Once the patient moves into the stabilization phase of treatment, the patient shall undergo a direct observation, presumptive test every 45 days for one year while in treatment.(d) Following the stabilization phase of treatment, the patient moves into the maintenance phase of treatment and during the maintenance phase of treatment shall undergo a direct observation, presumptive test every six months thereafter until discharge from the program.(e) At any point the provider wants to assess compliance, the patient must be willing to produce a direct observation presumptive or definitive test upon the provider request.(f) Unexpected findings from presumptive test issued pursuant to this section may be subject to confirmation of results or testing of additional substances of concern for which presumptive testing is inadequate or unavailable by a definitive testing method.